Utah statutes.
59-13-312.   Special fuel user records -- Auditing requirements -- Deposit
of funds with treasurer as dedicated credits.
(1) (a)  A user claiming a refund for taxes paid to a supplier shall retain on
file a receipt or invoice, or a microfilm or microfiche of the receipt or
invoice, evidencing the purchase of special fuel and the payment of the tax.
(b)  The commission may require the user to furnish summaries or copies of
original documentation substantiating the amount of refund claimed.
(2)  If the payer of this tax or the person dealing in special fuel does not
maintain records in this state so that an audit of the records may be made by
the commission or its representative, that person may be required to:
(a)  forward the necessary records to the commission for examination; or
(b)  pay the necessary expenses for an auditor of the commission to travel to
the location of the records outside of this state to make an examination.
(3)  Funds collected under this section:
(a)  shall be deposited with the state treasurer; and
(b)  are dedicated credits for the commission.
